Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 26 Accidents and Accident Reports

31-26-1.
Duty to stop in accidents resulting in personal injury.

The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in an accident resulting in injury to, serious bodily injury to, or death of any person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible, but shall then immediately return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of §

31-26-3

. A stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under circumstances which result in injury to any person shall upon conviction be punished by a mandatory loss of license for at least one year and not more than five (5) years and imprisonment for not more than five (5) years and/or fined up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under circumstances which result in serious bodily injury to any person shall upon conviction be punished as follows:

Every person convicted of a first violation shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year and for not more than ten (10) years and by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional institutions. Additionally, the license of the person shall be revoked for a period of up to two (2) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

For a second or subsequent conviction under this subsection within a five (5) year period, a person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than fifteen (15) years and by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional institutions. Additionally, the license of the person shall be revoked for a period of up to four (4) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

As used in this subsection, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under circumstances which result in the death of any person, shall upon conviction be punished pursuant to the provisions of this subsection as follows:

Every person convicted of a first violation of this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than two (2) years and for not more than fifteen (15) years, in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and his or her license to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of three (3) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

Every person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection within a five (5) year period shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than five (5) years and for not more than twenty (20) years, in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and his or her license to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of five (5) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

This section shall apply in its entirety to any driver of a motor vehicle knowingly involved in an accident with a person riding a bicycle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-1

; P.L. 1978, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 585, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 354, § 1.

31-26-2.
Duty to stop in accidents resulting in damage to vehicle.

The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible, but shall immediately return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of §

31-26-3

. A stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary. Any person failing to stop or comply with these requirements under the circumstances shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and/or his or her driver’s license or operating privilege in the state may be suspended for a period up to six (6) months, and/or he or she may be imprisoned for a period not to exceed 6 months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-2

; P.L. 1992, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 329, § 1.

31-26-3.
Duty to give information and render aid.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the striking of, the injury to, or death of any person or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall, upon request, give his or her name, address, and the registration number of the vehicle the driver is driving and shall exhibit his or her operator’s or chauffeur’s license to the person struck, or to the driver or occupant, or to the person attending any vehicle collided with. The driver shall render to any person injured or struck in an accident reasonable assistance, and shall immediately, by the quickest means of communication known to the driver or which should have reasonably been known to the driver to be available in the locality, give notice of the accident to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the office so notified does not have jurisdiction of the locale of the accident, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to immediately give notice of the accident to the office having jurisdiction.

The officer receiving the notice set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall, if the circumstances reasonably require, immediately dispatch an ambulance or emergency medical service to the scene of the accident. Any police or fire department responding to a call for emergency medical service or assistance to a person injured in an accident shall continue to the locale of the accident even though it is outside the jurisdiction of the department and shall render any emergency service that is reasonably necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-3

; P.L. 1968, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 297, § 1.

31-26-3.1.
Duty to stop in accidents resulting in death or injury to domesticated animals.

The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in an accident resulting in death or injury to a domesticated animal, shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible, but shall immediately return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until the driver shall render all possible assistance to the injured animal. The driver shall immediately, by the quickest means of communication known to the driver or which should have reasonably been known to be available to the driver to be available in the locality, give notice of the accident to the owner of the animal if known to the driver or to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the office so notified does not have jurisdiction of the locale of the accident, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to give notice immediately of the accident to the office having jurisdiction.

Any person failing to stop or comply with the requirements of this section shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

31-26-3

; P.L. 1959, ch. 175, § 1.

31-26-3.2.
Immediate notice of accident.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person, or any vehicle other than a vehicle moved by human power becoming so disabled as to prevent its normal and safe operation, shall immediately by the quickest means of communication give notice of the accident to the nearest office of a duly authorized police authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 7.

31-26-3.3.
Duty to stop in accidents involving motor vehicles and bicycles not resulting in serious bodily injury or death — Duty to give information and render aid — Penalty.

The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in an accident with a person riding a bicycle shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible, and shall immediately return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident. The driver shall render to any person injured or struck in an accident reasonable assistance, and shall immediately, by the quickest means of communication known to the driver or which should have reasonably been known to the driver to be available in the locality, give notice of the accident to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the office so notified does not have jurisdiction of the locale of the accident, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to immediately give notice of the accident to the office having jurisdiction.

The officer receiving the notice set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall, if the circumstances reasonably require, immediately dispatch an ambulance or emergency medical service to the scene of the accident. Any police or fire department responding to a call for emergency medical service or assistance to a person injured in an accident shall continue to the locale of the accident even though it is outside the jurisdiction of the department and shall render any emergency service that is reasonably necessary.

The driver of the vehicle shall, upon request, give his or her name, address, and registration number of the vehicle the driver is driving and shall exhibit his/her operator’s or chauffeur’s license to the person struck, but in any event shall remain at the scene of the accident until he/she has fulfilled the requirements of §

31-26-3

.

Any person failing to stop or comply with these requirements under the circumstances shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and may have his or her driver’s license or operating privilege in this state suspended for up to six (6) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 585, § 2.

31-26-4.
Duty on collision with unattended vehicle.

The driver of any vehicle which collides with another vehicle which is unattended and damage results to either vehicle shall immediately stop and shall then and there either locate and notify the operator or owner of the unattended vehicle of the name and address of the driver and owner of the vehicle striking the unattended vehicle or shall leave in a conspicuous place in or upon the unattended vehicle a notice written in the English language giving the name and address of the driver and of the owner of the vehicle doing the striking and a statement of the circumstances of the collision, and shall immediately give notice of the accident to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the office so notified does not have jurisdiction of the locale of the accident, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to immediately give notice of the accident to the office having jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-4

.

31-26-5.
Duty in accident resulting in damage to highway fixtures.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to fixtures legally upon or adjacent to a highway shall take reasonable steps to locate and notify the owner or person in charge of the property of the fact and of his or her name and address and of the registration number of the vehicle the driver is driving. The driver shall upon request exhibit his or her operator’s or chauffeur’s license and shall immediately give notice of the accident to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the office so notified does not have jurisdiction of the locale of the accident, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to immediately give notice of the accident to the office having jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 5; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-5

.

31-26-6.
Drivers required to make written reports.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or in which the damage to property of any one person, including himself or herself, in excess of one thousand dollars ($1000) is sustained, shall, within twenty-one (21) days after the accident, forward a written report of the accident to the division of motor vehicles, on forms provided by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 253, § 1.

31-26-7.
Supplemental reports.

The division of motor vehicles may require any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident of which a report must be made as provided in §

31-26-6

to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-7

.

31-26-8.
Reports by owner when driver incapable.

Whenever the driver is physically incapable of making a written report of an accident as required in §

31-26-6

and the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the owner of the vehicle involved in the accident shall within twenty one (21) days after learning of the accident make the report not made by the driver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 428, § 1.

31-26-9.
Reports by law enforcement officers.

Every law enforcement officer who, in the regular course of duty, investigates a motor vehicle accident of which a report must be made as required and in accordance with subsections (a), (b), (d) and (e) of this section, either at the time of and at the scene of the accident or thereafter by interviewing participants or witnesses shall, effective January 1, 2003, submit all investigated and reportable accident reports to the department of transportation electronically. The form utilized shall be the newly revised accident form developed by the department of transportation in cooperation with the division of motor vehicles. The electronic accident report shall be transferred using the Rhode Island Accident Data Export Manager over the Rhode Island Law Enforcement Telecommunication System (RILETS) to the department of transportation.

The law enforcement agency or its contracted agent shall transmit an electronic accident report to the department of transportation within fourteen (14) days of the investigation or preparing of the report and may maintain a copy locally.

The driver of a vehicle that is involved in an accident shall submit the motorist accident report form to the division of motor vehicles within twenty-one (21) days of the accident, pursuant to §

31-26-6

.

Any accident occurring on a highway or upon premises open to the public resulting in injury or death to any person or damage to property equal to or in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) is subject to the reporting requirements. In addition, the division of motor vehicles will take action on reported accidents in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for compliance with the state financial responsibility law pursuant to §

31-26-6

.

The department of transportation shall serve as the accident data repository agency for the electronic accident reports submitted by the law enforcement agencies in the state, and the division of motor vehicles shall remain as the repository agency for all motorist accident reports. “Personal information,” as defined in §

11-49.3-3

, and associated with accident reports submitted pursuant to this section shall remain privileged except that the information may be provided to an involved party to the accident or their legal representative, an insurance company, or insurance-support organization or in accordance with Rhode Island general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-9

; P.L. 2001, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-26-10.
Accident report forms — Contents.

The division of motor vehicles shall prepare and upon request supply to police departments and other suitable agencies or individuals, forms for accident reports required by this chapter, appropriate with respect to the persons required to make those reports and the purposes to be served. The written reports to be made by persons involved in accidents and by investigating officers shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose with reference to a traffic accident the cause, conditions then existing, and the persons and vehicle involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-10

.

31-26-11.
Penalties for failure to report.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the license or permit to drive, and any nonresident operating privileges, of any person failing to report an accident as provided in this chapter until the report has been filed. Any person convicted of failing to make a report as required in this chapter shall be punished as provided in §

31-27-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 1950 (s.s), ch. 2639, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-11

.

31-26-12.
Garage reports of bullet damage.

The person in charge of any garage or repair shop to which is brought any motor vehicle which shows evidence of having been struck by any bullet, shall report to the nearest local or state police after the motor vehicle is received, giving the engine number, registration number, and the name and address of the owner or operator of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-12

.

31-26-13.
Reports confidential — Use as evidence.

All motorist accident reports made by persons involved in accidents, pursuant to §

31-26-6

, or by garages, pursuant to §

31-26-12

, shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the division of motor vehicles or other state or municipal agencies having use for the records for accident prevention purposes or for the administration of the laws of this state relating to the deposit of security and proof of financial responsibility by persons driving or the owners of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles may disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when the identity is not otherwise known or when the person denies his or her presence at the accident, and except that the reports, as well as police reports, may be used by the division of motor vehicles, together with any other evidence that the division of motor vehicles may deem appropriate, to make determinations as to the reasonable possibility of a judgment being rendered for purposes of requiring security after an accident involving one or more uninsured motorists.

No report shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident, except that the division of motor vehicles shall furnish upon demand of any person who has, or claims to have, made a report or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the division of motor vehicles solely to prove a compliance or a failure to comply with the requirement that a report be made to the division. Provided, that in the event an accident report has not been filed, then the failure to file the report shall be considered to be prima facie evidence that the operator and/or the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved was uninsured at the time of the accident.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-13

; P.L. 1971, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-26-14.
Tabulation and publication of statistical information.

The division of motor vehicles shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports and shall publish annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical information based on the reports as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-14

.

31-26-15.
Reports required by municipalities.

Any incorporated city, town, village, or other municipality may by ordinance require that the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident shall also file with a designated city or town department a report of the accident or a copy of any report that is required to be filed with the division of motor vehicles. All the reports shall be for the confidential use of the city or town department and subject to the provisions of §

31-26-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 23, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-26-15

.

31-26-16.
Uniform statewide motor vehicle accident police report.

There is established a uniform statewide motor vehicle accident police report which shall be used by the Rhode Island state police and all other state or municipal police departments.

This report shall include any information that the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police in consultation with the Municipal Police Chiefs Association shall deem appropriate.

The failure of a police department to use the uniform report form when taking a report shall not be used:

By a defendant in a criminal prosecution or violation hearing as grounds for challenge to, or dismissal of, any charges or citations arising out of the motor vehicle accident; or

As a basis to challenge the admissibility of a police report in any administrative or judicial proceeding, civil or criminal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 166, § 1.